Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.142.040

Authority of chapter—Supplemental.

The authority granted by this chapter is in addition and supplemental to any previously granted or future authority granted to the University of Washington or Washington State University and shall not be construed to limit the existing or future powers or authority of these universities, including without limitation the authority to issue bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330, 28B.20.145, or 28B.20.395 through 28B.20.398, or chapter 28B.140 RCW, or to participate in state reimbursable bond, certificate of participation, or other state debt programs.

[ 2007 c 24 s 5.]